Illinois, session 104th, SB1200.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Capital Crimes Litigation Act of 2025. 6    Section 5. Appointment of trial counsel in death penalty 7cases. If an indigent defendant is charged with an offense for 8which a sentence of death is authorized, and the State's 9Attorney has not, at or before arraignment, filed a 10certificate indicating he or she will not seek the death 11penalty or stated on the record in open court that the death 12penalty will not be sought, the trial court shall immediately 13appoint the Public Defender, or any other qualified attorney 14or attorneys as the Illinois Supreme Court shall by rule 15provide, to represent the defendant as trial counsel. If the 16Public Defender is appointed, he or she shall immediately 17assign the attorney or attorneys who are public defenders to 18represent the defendant. The counsel shall meet the 19qualifications as the Supreme Court shall by rule provide. At 20the request of court appointed counsel in a case in which the 21death penalty is sought, attorneys employed by the State 22Appellate Defender may enter an appearance for the limited 23purpose of assisting counsel appointed under this Section.    SB1200- 2 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    Section 10. Court appointed trial counsel; compensation 2and expenses. 3    (a) This Section applies only to compensation and expenses 4of trial counsel appointed by the court as set forth in Section 55, other than public defenders, for the period after 6arraignment and so long as the State's Attorney has not, at any 7time, filed a certificate indicating he or she will not seek 8the death penalty or stated on the record in open court that 9the death penalty will not be sought.10    (a-5) Litigation budget.11        (1) In a case in which the State has filed a statement 12    of intent to seek the death penalty, the court shall 13    require appointed counsel, including those appointed in 14    Cook County, after counsel has had adequate time to review 15    the case and prior to engaging trial assistance, to submit 16    a proposed estimated litigation budget for court approval, 17    that will be subject to modification in light of facts and 18    developments that emerge as the case proceeds. Case 19    budgets should be submitted ex parte and filed and 20    maintained under seal in order to protect the defendant's 21    right to effective assistance of counsel, right not to 22    incriminate him or herself and all applicable privileges. 23    Case budgets shall be reviewed and approved by the judge 24    assigned to try the case. As provided under subsection (c) 25    of this Section, petitions for compensation shall be   SB1200- 3 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    reviewed by both the trial judge and the presiding judge 2    or the presiding judge's designee. 3        (2) The litigation budget shall serve purposes 4    comparable to those of private retainer agreements by 5    confirming both the court's and the attorney's 6    expectations regarding fees and expenses. Consideration 7    should be given to employing an ex parte pretrial 8    conference in order to facilitate reaching agreement on a 9    litigation budget at the earliest opportunity.10        (3) The budget shall be incorporated into a sealed 11    initial pretrial order that reflects the understandings of 12    the court and counsel regarding all matters affecting 13    counsel compensation and reimbursement and payments for 14    investigative, expert and other services, including, but 15    not limited to, the following matters:16            (A) the hourly rate at which counsel will be 17        compensated;18            (B) the hourly rate at which private 19        investigators, other than investigators employed by 20        the Office of the State Appellate Defender, will be 21        compensated; and22            (C) the best preliminary estimate that can be made 23        of the cost of all services, including, but not 24        limited to, counsel, expert, and investigative 25        services, that are likely to be needed through the 26        guilt and penalty phases of the trial. The court shall   SB1200- 4 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1        have discretion to require that budgets be prepared 2        for shorter intervals of time.3        (4) Appointed counsel may obtain, subject to later 4    review, investigative, expert or other services without 5    prior authorization if necessary for an adequate defense. 6    If the services are obtained, the presiding judge or the 7    presiding judge's designee shall consider in an ex parte 8    proceeding that timely procurement of necessary services 9    could not await prior authorization. If an ex parte 10    hearing is requested by defense counsel or deemed 11    necessary by the trial judge prior to modifying a budget, 12    the ex parte hearing shall be before the presiding judge 13    or the presiding judge's designee. The judge may then 14    authorize the services nunc pro tunc. If the presiding 15    judge or the presiding judge's designee finds that the 16    services were not reasonable, payment may be denied.17        (5) An approved budget shall guide counsel's use of 18    time and resources by indicating the services for which 19    compensation is authorized. The case budget shall be 20    re-evaluated when justified by changed or unexpected 21    circumstances and shall be modified by the court when 22    reasonable and necessary for an adequate defense. If an ex 23    parte hearing is requested by defense counsel or deemed 24    necessary by the trial judge prior to modifying a budget, 25    the ex parte hearing shall be before the presiding judge 26    or the presiding judge's designee.  SB1200- 5 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    (b) Appointed trial counsel shall be compensated upon 2presentment and certification by the circuit court of a claim 3for services detailing the date, activity, and time duration 4for which compensation is sought. Compensation for appointed 5trial counsel may be paid at a reasonable rate not to exceed 6$125 per hour. The court shall not authorize payment of bills 7that are not properly itemized. A request for payment shall be 8presented under seal and reviewed ex parte with a court 9reporter present. Every January 20, the statutory rate 10prescribed in this subsection shall be automatically increased 11or decreased, as applicable, by a percentage equal to the 12percentage change in the consumer price index-u during the 13preceding 12-month calendar year. "Consumer price index-u" 14means the index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of 15the United States Department of Labor that measures the 16average change in prices of goods and services purchased by 17all urban consumers, United States city average, all items, 181982-84=100. The new rate resulting from each annual 19adjustment shall be determined by the State Treasurer and made 20available to the chief judge of each judicial circuit.21    (c) Appointed trial counsel may also petition the court 22for certification of expenses for reasonable and necessary 23capital litigation expenses including, but not limited to, 24investigatory and other assistance, expert, forensic, and 25other witnesses, and mitigation specialists. Each provider of 26proposed services must specify the best preliminary estimate   SB1200- 6 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1that can be made in light of information received in the case 2at that point, and the provider must sign this estimate under 3the provisions of Section 1-109 of the Code of Civil 4Procedure. A provider of proposed services must also specify: 5(1) his or her hourly rate; (2) the hourly rate of anyone else 6in his or her employ for whom reimbursement is sought; and (3) 7the hourly rate of any person or entity that may be 8subcontracted to perform these services. Counsel may not 9petition for certification of expenses that may have been 10provided or compensated by the State Appellate Defender under 11item (c)(5.1) of Section 10 of the State Appellate Defender 12Act. The petitions shall be filed under seal and considered ex 13parte but with a court reporter present for all ex parte 14conferences. If the requests are submitted after services have 15been rendered, the requests shall be supported by an invoice 16describing the services rendered, the dates the services were 17performed and the amount of time spent. These petitions shall 18be reviewed by both the trial judge and the presiding judge of 19the circuit court or the presiding judge's designee. The 20petitions and orders shall be kept under seal and shall be 21exempt from Freedom of Information requests until the 22conclusion of the trial, even if the prosecution chooses not 23to pursue the death penalty prior to trial or sentencing. If an 24ex parte hearing is requested by defense counsel or deemed 25necessary by the trial judge, the hearing shall be before the 26presiding judge or the presiding judge's designee.  SB1200- 7 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    (d) Appointed trial counsel shall petition the court for 2certification of compensation and expenses under this Section 3periodically during the course of counsel's representation. 4The petitions shall be supported by itemized bills showing the 5date, the amount of time spent, the work done and the total 6being charged for each entry. The court shall not authorize 7payment of bills that are not properly itemized. The court 8must certify reasonable and necessary expenses of the 9petitioner for travel and per diem (lodging, meals, and 10incidental expenses). These expenses must be paid at the rate 11as promulgated by the United States General Services 12Administration for these expenses for the date and location in 13which they were incurred, unless extraordinary reasons are 14shown for the difference. The petitions shall be filed under 15seal and considered ex parte but with a court reporter present 16for all ex parte conferences. The petitions shall be reviewed 17by both the trial judge and the presiding judge of the circuit 18court or the presiding judge's designee. If an ex parte 19hearing is requested by defense counsel or deemed necessary by 20the trial judge, the ex parte hearing shall be before the 21presiding judge or the presiding judge's designee. If the 22court determines that the compensation and expenses should be 23paid from the Capital Litigation Trust Fund, the court shall 24certify, on a form created by the State Treasurer, that all or 25a designated portion of the amount requested is reasonable, 26necessary, and appropriate for payment from the Trust Fund.   SB1200- 8 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1The form must also be signed by lead trial counsel under the 2provisions of Section 1-109 of the Code of Civil Procedure 3verifying that the amount requested is reasonable, necessary, 4and appropriate. Bills submitted for payment by any individual 5or entity seeking payment from the Capital Litigation Trust 6Fund must also be accompanied by a form created by the State 7Treasurer and signed by the individual or responsible agent of 8the entity under the provisions of Section 1-109 of the Code of 9Civil Procedure that the amount requested is accurate and 10truthful and reflects time spent or expenses incurred. 11Certification of compensation and expenses by a court in any 12county other than Cook County shall be delivered by the court 13to the State Treasurer and must be paid by the State Treasurer 14directly from the Capital Litigation Trust Fund if there are 15sufficient moneys in the Trust Fund to pay the compensation 16and expenses. If the State Treasurer finds within 14 days of 17his or her receipt of a certification that the compensation 18and expenses to be paid are unreasonable, unnecessary, or 19inappropriate, he or she may return the certification to the 20court setting forth in detail the objection or objections with 21a request for the court to review the objection or objections 22before resubmitting the certification. The State Treasurer 23must send the claimant a copy of the objection or objections. 24The State Treasurer may only seek a review of a specific 25objection once. The claimant has 7 days from his or her receipt 26of the objections to file a response with the court. With or   SB1200- 9 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1without further hearing, the court must promptly rule on the 2objections. The petitions and orders shall be kept under seal 3and shall be exempt from Freedom of Information requests until 4the conclusion of the trial and appeal of the case, even if the 5prosecution chooses not to pursue the death penalty prior to 6trial or sentencing. Certification of compensation and 7expenses by a court in Cook County shall be delivered by the 8court to the county treasurer and paid by the county treasurer 9from moneys granted to the county from the Capital Litigation 10Trust Fund. 11    Section 15. Capital Litigation Trust Fund. 12    (a) The Capital Litigation Trust Fund is created as a 13special fund in the State Treasury. The Trust Fund shall be 14administered by the State Treasurer to provide moneys for the 15appropriations to be made, grants to be awarded, and 16compensation and expenses to be paid under this Act. All 17interest earned from the investment or deposit of moneys 18accumulated in the Trust Fund shall, under Section 4.1 of the 19State Finance Act, be deposited into the Trust Fund.20    (b) Moneys deposited into the Trust Fund shall not be 21considered general revenue of the State of Illinois.22    (c) Moneys deposited into the Trust Fund shall be used 23exclusively for the purposes of providing funding for the 24prosecution and defense of capital cases and for providing 25funding for post-conviction proceedings in capital cases under   SB1200- 10 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1Article 122 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 and in 2relation to petitions filed under Section 2-1401 of the Code 3of Civil Procedure in relation to capital cases as provided in 4this Act and shall not be appropriated, loaned, or in any 5manner transferred to the General Revenue Fund of the State of 6Illinois.7    (d) Every fiscal year the State Treasurer shall transfer 8from the General Revenue Fund to the Capital Litigation Trust 9Fund an amount equal to the full amount of moneys appropriated 10by the General Assembly (both by original and supplemental 11appropriation), less any unexpended balance from the previous 12fiscal year, from the Capital Litigation Trust Fund for the 13specific purpose of making funding available for the 14prosecution and defense of capital cases and for the 15litigation expenses associated with post-conviction 16proceedings in capital cases under Article 122 of the Code of 17Criminal Procedure of 1963 and in relation to petitions filed 18under Section 2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure in 19relation to capital cases. The Public Defender and State's 20Attorney in Cook County, the State Appellate Defender, the 21State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor, and the Attorney 22General shall make annual requests for appropriations from the 23Trust Fund.24        (1) The Public Defender in Cook County shall request 25    appropriations to the State Treasurer for expenses 26    incurred by the Public Defender and for funding for   SB1200- 11 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    private appointed defense counsel in Cook County.2        (2) The State's Attorney in Cook County shall request 3    an appropriation to the State Treasurer for expenses 4    incurred by the State's Attorney.5        (3) The State Appellate Defender shall request a 6    direct appropriation from the Trust Fund for expenses 7    incurred by the State Appellate Defender in providing 8    assistance to trial attorneys under item (c)(5.1) of 9    Section 10 of the State Appellate Defender Act and for 10    expenses incurred by the State Appellate Defender in 11    representing petitioners in capital cases in 12    post-conviction proceedings under Article 122 of the Code 13    of Criminal Procedure of 1963 and in relation to petitions 14    filed under Section 2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure 15    in relation to capital cases and for the representation of 16    those petitioners by attorneys approved by or contracted 17    with the State Appellate Defender and an appropriation to 18    the State Treasurer for payments from the Trust Fund for 19    the defense of cases in counties other than Cook County.20        (4) The State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor shall 21    request a direct appropriation from the Trust Fund to pay 22    expenses incurred by the State's Attorneys Appellate 23    Prosecutor and an appropriation to the State Treasurer for 24    payments from the Trust Fund for expenses incurred by 25    State's Attorneys in counties other than Cook County.26        (5) The Attorney General shall request a direct   SB1200- 12 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    appropriation from the Trust Fund to pay expenses incurred 2    by the Attorney General in assisting the State's Attorneys 3    in counties other than Cook County and to pay for expenses 4    incurred by the Attorney General when the Attorney General 5    is ordered by the presiding judge of the Criminal Division 6    of the Circuit Court of Cook County to prosecute or 7    supervise the prosecution of Cook County cases and for 8    expenses incurred by the Attorney General in representing 9    the State in post-conviction proceedings in capital cases 10    under Article 122 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 11    1963 and in relation to petitions filed under Section 12    2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure in relation to 13    capital cases. The Public Defender and State's Attorney in 14    Cook County, the State Appellate Defender, the State's 15    Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor, and the Attorney General 16    may each request supplemental appropriations from the 17    Trust Fund during the fiscal year.18    (e) Moneys in the Trust Fund shall be expended only as 19follows:20        (1) To pay the State Treasurer's costs to administer 21    the Trust Fund. The amount for this purpose may not exceed 22    5% in any one fiscal year of the amount otherwise 23    appropriated from the Trust Fund in the same fiscal year. 24        (2) To pay the capital litigation expenses of trial 25    defense and post-conviction proceedings in capital cases 26    under Article 122 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of   SB1200- 13 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    1963 and in relation to petitions filed under Section 2    2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure in relation to 3    capital cases including, but not limited to, DNA testing, 4    including DNA testing under Section 116-3 of the Code of 5    Criminal Procedure of 1963, analysis, and expert 6    testimony, investigatory and other assistance, expert, 7    forensic, and other witnesses, and mitigation specialists, 8    and grants and aid provided to public defenders, appellate 9    defenders, and any attorney approved by or contracted with 10    the State Appellate Defender representing petitioners in 11    post-conviction proceedings in capital cases under Article 12    122 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 and in 13    relation to petitions filed under Section 2-1401 of the 14    Code of Civil Procedure in relation to capital cases or 15    assistance to attorneys who have been appointed by the 16    court to represent defendants who are charged with capital 17    crimes. Reasonable and necessary capital litigation 18    expenses include travel and per diem (lodging, meals, and 19    incidental expenses).20        (3) To pay the compensation of trial attorneys, other 21    than public defenders or appellate defenders, who have 22    been appointed by the court to represent defendants who 23    are charged with capital crimes or attorneys approved by 24    or contracted with the State Appellate Defender to 25    represent petitioners in post-conviction proceedings in 26    capital cases under Article 122 of the Code of Criminal   SB1200- 14 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    Procedure of 1963 and in relation to petitions filed under 2    Section 2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure in relation 3    to capital cases.4        (4) To provide State's Attorneys with funding for 5    capital litigation expenses and for expenses of 6    representing the State in post-conviction proceedings in 7    capital cases under Article 122 of the Code of Criminal 8    Procedure of 1963 and in relation to petitions filed under 9    Section 2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure in relation 10    to capital cases including, but not limited to, 11    investigatory and other assistance and expert, forensic, 12    and other witnesses necessary to prosecute capital cases. 13    State's Attorneys in any county other than Cook County 14    seeking funding for capital litigation expenses and for 15    expenses of representing the State in post-conviction 16    proceedings in capital cases under Article 122 of the Code 17    of Criminal Procedure of 1963 and in relation to petitions 18    filed under Section 2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure 19    in relation to capital cases including, but not limited 20    to, investigatory and other assistance and expert, 21    forensic, or other witnesses under this Section may 22    request that the State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor or 23    the Attorney General, as the case may be, certify the 24    expenses as reasonable, necessary, and appropriate for 25    payment from the Trust Fund, on a form created by the State 26    Treasurer. Upon certification of the expenses and delivery   SB1200- 15 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    of the certification to the State Treasurer, the Treasurer 2    shall pay the expenses directly from the Capital 3    Litigation Trust Fund if there are sufficient moneys in 4    the Trust Fund to pay the expenses.5        (5) To provide financial support through the Attorney 6    General under the Attorney General Act for the several 7    county State's Attorneys outside of Cook County, but shall 8    not be used to increase personnel for the Attorney 9    General's Office, except when the Attorney General is 10    ordered by the presiding judge of the Criminal Division of 11    the Circuit Court of Cook County to prosecute or supervise 12    the prosecution of Cook County cases.13        (6) To provide financial support through the State's 14    Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor under the State's Attorneys 15    Appellate Prosecutor's Act for the several county State's 16    Attorneys outside of Cook County, but shall not be used to 17    increase personnel for the State's Attorneys Appellate 18    Prosecutor.19        (7) To provide financial support to the State 20    Appellate Defender under the State Appellate Defender Act. 21    Moneys expended from the Trust Fund shall be in addition 22    to county funding for Public Defenders and State's 23    Attorneys, and shall not be used to supplant or reduce 24    ordinary and customary county funding.25    (f) Moneys in the Trust Fund shall be appropriated to the 26State Appellate Defender, the State's Attorneys Appellate   SB1200- 16 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1Prosecutor, the Attorney General, and the State Treasurer. The 2State Appellate Defender shall receive an appropriation from 3the Trust Fund to enable it to provide assistance to appointed 4defense counsel and attorneys approved by or contracted with 5the State Appellate Defender to represent petitioners in 6post-conviction proceedings in capital cases under Article 122 7of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 and in relation to 8petitions filed under Section 2-1401 of the Code of Civil 9Procedure in relation to capital cases throughout the State 10and to Public Defenders in counties other than Cook. The 11State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor and the Attorney 12General shall receive appropriations from the Trust Fund to 13enable them to provide assistance to State's Attorneys in 14counties other than Cook County and when the Attorney General 15is ordered by the presiding judge of the Criminal Division of 16the Circuit Court of Cook County to prosecute or supervise the 17prosecution of Cook County cases. Moneys shall be appropriated 18to the State Treasurer to enable the Treasurer: (i) to make 19grants to Cook County; (ii) to pay the expenses of Public 20Defenders, the State Appellate Defender, the Attorney General, 21the Office of the State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor, and 22State's Attorneys in counties other than Cook County; (iii) to 23pay the expenses and compensation of appointed defense counsel 24and attorneys approved by or contracted with the State 25Appellate Defender to represent petitioners in post-conviction 26proceedings in capital cases under Article 122 of the Code of   SB1200- 17 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1Criminal Procedure of 1963 and in relation to petitions filed 2under Section 2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure in 3relation to capital cases in counties other than Cook County; 4and (iv) to pay the costs of administering the Trust Fund. All 5expenditures and grants made from the Trust Fund shall be 6subject to audit by the Auditor General.7    (g) For Cook County, grants from the Trust Fund shall be 8made and administered as follows:9        (1) For each State fiscal year, the State's Attorney 10    and Public Defender must each make a separate application 11    to the State Treasurer for capital litigation grants.12        (2) The State Treasurer shall establish rules and 13    procedures for grant applications. The rules shall require 14    the Cook County Treasurer as the grant recipient to report 15    on a periodic basis to the State Treasurer how much of the 16    grant has been expended, how much of the grant is 17    remaining, and the purposes for which the grant has been 18    used. The rules may also require the Cook County Treasurer 19    to certify on a periodic basis that expenditures of the 20    funds have been made for expenses that are reasonable, 21    necessary, and appropriate for payment from the Trust 22    Fund.23        (3) The State Treasurer shall make the grants to the 24    Cook County Treasurer as soon as possible after the 25    beginning of the State fiscal year.26        (4) The State's Attorney or Public Defender may apply   SB1200- 18 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    for supplemental grants during the fiscal year.2        (5) Grant moneys shall be paid to the Cook County 3    Treasurer in block grants and held in separate accounts 4    for the State's Attorney, the Public Defender, and court 5    appointed defense counsel other than the Cook County 6    Public Defender, respectively, for the designated fiscal 7    year, and are not subject to county appropriation.8        (6) Expenditure of grant moneys under this subsection 9    (g) is subject to audit by the Auditor General.10        (7) The Cook County Treasurer shall immediately make 11    payment from the appropriate separate account in the 12    county treasury for capital litigation expenses to the 13    State's Attorney, Public Defender, or court appointed 14    defense counsel other than the Public Defender, as the 15    case may be, upon order of the State's Attorney, Public 16    Defender or the court, respectively.17    (h) If a defendant in a capital case in Cook County is 18represented by court appointed counsel other than the Cook 19County Public Defender, the appointed counsel shall petition 20the court for an order directing the Cook County Treasurer to 21pay the court appointed counsel's reasonable and necessary 22compensation and capital litigation expenses from grant moneys 23provided from the Trust Fund. The petitions shall be supported 24by itemized bills showing the date, the amount of time spent, 25the work done and the total being charged for each entry. The 26court shall not authorize payment of bills that are not   SB1200- 19 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1properly itemized. The petitions shall be filed under seal and 2considered ex parte but with a court reporter present for all 3ex parte conferences. The petitions shall be reviewed by both 4the trial judge and the presiding judge of the circuit court or 5the presiding judge's designee. The petitions and orders shall 6be kept under seal and shall be exempt from Freedom of 7Information requests until the conclusion of the trial and 8appeal of the case, even if the prosecution chooses not to 9pursue the death penalty prior to trial or sentencing. Orders 10denying petitions for compensation or expenses are final. 11Counsel may not petition for expenses that may have been 12provided or compensated by the State Appellate Defender under 13item (c)(5.1) of Section 10 of the State Appellate Defender 14Act.15    (i) In counties other than Cook County, and when the 16Attorney General is ordered by the presiding judge of the 17Criminal Division of the Circuit Court of Cook County to 18prosecute or supervise the prosecution of Cook County cases, 19and excluding capital litigation expenses or services that may 20have been provided by the State Appellate Defender under item 21(c)(5.1) of Section 10 of the State Appellate Defender Act:22        (1) Upon certification by the circuit court, on a form 23    created by the State Treasurer, that all or a portion of 24    the expenses are reasonable, necessary, and appropriate 25    for payment from the Trust Fund and the court's delivery 26    of the certification to the Treasurer, the Treasurer shall   SB1200- 20 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    pay the certified expenses of Public Defenders and the 2    State Appellate Defender from the money appropriated to 3    the Treasurer for capital litigation expenses of Public 4    Defenders and post-conviction proceeding expenses in 5    capital cases of the State Appellate Defender and expenses 6    in relation to petitions filed under Section 2-1401 of the 7    Code of Civil Procedure in relation to capital cases in 8    any county other than Cook County, if there are sufficient 9    moneys in the Trust Fund to pay the expenses.10        (2) If a defendant in a capital case is represented by 11    court appointed counsel other than the Public Defender, 12    the appointed counsel shall petition the court to certify 13    compensation and capital litigation expenses including, 14    but not limited to, investigatory and other assistance, 15    expert, forensic, and other witnesses, and mitigation 16    specialists as reasonable, necessary, and appropriate for 17    payment from the Trust Fund. If a petitioner in a capital 18    case who has filed a petition for post-conviction relief 19    under Article 122 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 20    1963 or a petition under Section 2-1401 of the Code of 21    Civil Procedure in relation to capital cases is 22    represented by an attorney approved by or contracted with 23    the State Appellate Defender other than the State 24    Appellate Defender, that attorney shall petition the court 25    to certify compensation and litigation expenses of 26    post-conviction proceedings under Article 122 of the Code   SB1200- 21 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    of Criminal Procedure of 1963 or in relation to petitions 2    filed under Section 2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure 3    in relation to capital cases. Upon certification on a form 4    created by the State Treasurer of all or a portion of the 5    compensation and expenses certified as reasonable, 6    necessary, and appropriate for payment from the Trust Fund 7    and the court's delivery of the certification to the 8    Treasurer, the State Treasurer shall pay the certified 9    compensation and expenses from the money appropriated to 10    the Treasurer for that purpose, if there are sufficient 11    moneys in the Trust Fund to make those payments.12        (3) A petition for capital litigation expenses or 13    post-conviction proceeding expenses or expenses incurred 14    in filing a petition under Section 2-1401 of the Code of 15    Civil Procedure in relation to capital cases under this 16    subsection shall be considered under seal and reviewed ex 17    parte with a court reporter present. Orders denying 18    petitions for compensation or expenses are final.19    (j) If the Trust Fund is discontinued or dissolved by an 20Act of the General Assembly or by operation of law, any balance 21remaining in the Trust Fund shall be returned to the General 22Revenue Fund after deduction of administrative costs, any 23other provision of this Act to the contrary notwithstanding.  24    Section 95. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 25changing Section 7.5 as follows:   SB1200- 22 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    (5 ILCS 140/7.5)2    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 3by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 4exempt from inspection and copying:5        (a) All information determined to be confidential 6    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 7    Development Act.8        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 9    library users with specific materials under the Library 10    Records Confidentiality Act.11        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 12    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 13    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 14    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 15    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 16    has received.17        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 18    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 19    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 20    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 21    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 22    Infection Control Act.23        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 24    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.25        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of   SB1200- 23 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 2    Qualifications Based Selection Act.3        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 4    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 5    Tuition Act.6        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 7    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 8    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 9    general's office that would be exempt if created or 10    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 11    that Act.12        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 13    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 14    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 15    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.16        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 17    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 18    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.19        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 20    or driver identification information compiled by a law 21    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 22    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.23        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 24    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 25    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 26    Prevention Review Team Act.  SB1200- 24 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 2    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 3    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 4    authorized under that Article.5        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 6    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 7    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 8    Capital Crimes Litigation Act of 2025 (repealed). This 9    subsection (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the 10    trial of the case, even if the prosecution chooses not to 11    pursue the death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.12        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 13    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 14    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.15        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 16    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 17    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 18    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 19    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 20    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Regional 21    Transportation Authority under Section 2.11 of the 22    Regional Transportation Authority Act, or the St. Clair 23    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 24    Act (repealed). 25        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 26    Personnel Record Review Act.   SB1200- 25 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 2    Illinois School Student Records Act. 3        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 4    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 5        (t) (Blank). 6        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 7    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 8    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 9        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 10    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 11    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 12    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 13    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 14    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 15    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 16    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 17    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 18    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 19        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 20    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 21    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.22        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 23    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 24    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.25        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 26    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section   SB1200- 26 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 2        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 3    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 4    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 5    information about the identity and administrative finding 6    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 7    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 8    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 9    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 10        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 11    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 12    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 13    Act. 14        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 15    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 16        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 17    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 18        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 19    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 20    authorized under that Act.21        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 22    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 23    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 24        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 25    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 26        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure   SB1200- 27 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 2        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 3    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 4    Code. 5        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 6    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 7        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 8    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 9    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 10        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 11    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 12    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 13    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 14    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 15        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 16    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 17        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 18    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 19    Aid Code. 20        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 21    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 22        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 23    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 24        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 25    arising out of a peer support counseling session 26    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders   SB1200- 28 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    Suicide Prevention Act. 2        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 3    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 4    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 5    Prevention Act. 6        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 7    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 8    under the Reproductive Health Act. 9        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 10    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 11        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 12    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 13    Human Rights Act.14        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 15    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 16    Act. 17        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 18    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 19        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 20    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 21    Public Aid Code. 22        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 23    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 24        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 25    information that shall not be made public under the 26    Illinois Insurance Code.   SB1200- 29 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 2    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.3        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 4    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 5        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 6    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 7        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 8    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 9    Police Act. 10        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 11    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 12    Administrative Code of Illinois. 13        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 14    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 15    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 16    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 17        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 18    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 19    Violence Fatality Review Act. 20        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 21    Act. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 22    July 1, 2025. 23        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 24    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 25    Agency Licensing Act. 26        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State   SB1200- 30 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 2    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 3    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 4    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 5    Act. 6        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 7    the School Safety Drill Act. 8        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 9    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 10        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 11    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 12    Act. 13        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 14    2-3.196 of the School Code. 15        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 16    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 17    Power Agency Act. 18        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 19    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 20    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 21        (ooo) (nnn) Data or information provided pursuant to 22    Section 20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment 23    Act. 24        (ppp) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 25    under Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity 26    Act.   SB1200- 31 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1        (qqq) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 2    under Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 3        (rrr) (mmm) Information prohibited from being 4    disclosed under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money 5    Transmission Modernization Act. 6        (sss) (nnn) Information exempt from disclosure under 7    Section 40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.8(Source: P.A. 102-36, eff. 6-25-21; 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 9102-292, eff. 1-1-22; 102-520, eff. 8-20-21; 102-559, eff. 108-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-946, eff. 7-1-22; 11102-1042, eff. 6-3-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 103-8, eff. 126-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, 13eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 14103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 157-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, 16eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 8-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 17103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; revised 11-26-24.) 18    Section 100. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 19Section 5.1030 as follows: 20    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)21    Sec. 5.1030. The Capital Litigation Trust Fund. 22    Section 105. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 23amended by changing Sections 113-3 and 119-1 as follows:   SB1200- 32 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    (725 ILCS 5/113-3)  (from Ch. 38, par. 113-3)2    Sec. 113-3. (a) Every person charged with an offense shall 3be allowed counsel before pleading to the charge. If the 4defendant desires counsel and has been unable to obtain same 5before arraignment the court shall recess court or continue 6the cause for a reasonable time to permit defendant to obtain 7counsel and consult with him before pleading to the charge. If 8the accused is a dissolved corporation, and is not represented 9by counsel, the court may, in the interest of justice, appoint 10as counsel a licensed attorney of this State.11    (b) In all cases, except where the penalty is a fine only, 12if the court determines that the defendant is indigent and 13desires counsel, the Public Defender shall be appointed as 14counsel. If there is no Public Defender in the county or if the 15defendant requests counsel other than the Public Defender and 16the court finds that the rights of the defendant will be 17prejudiced by the appointment of the Public Defender, the 18court shall appoint as counsel a licensed attorney at law of 19this State, except that in a county having a population of 202,000,000 or more the Public Defender shall be appointed as 21counsel in all misdemeanor cases where the defendant is 22indigent and desires counsel unless the case involves multiple 23defendants, in which case the court may appoint counsel other 24than the Public Defender for the additional defendants. The 25court shall require an affidavit signed by any defendant who   SB1200- 33 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1requests court-appointed counsel. Such affidavit shall be in 2the form established by the Supreme Court containing 3sufficient information to ascertain the assets and liabilities 4of that defendant. The Court may direct the Clerk of the 5Circuit Court to assist the defendant in the completion of the 6affidavit. Any person who knowingly files such affidavit 7containing false information concerning his assets and 8liabilities shall be liable to the county where the case, in 9which such false affidavit is filed, is pending for the 10reasonable value of the services rendered by the public 11defender or other court-appointed counsel in the case to the 12extent that such services were unjustly or falsely procured.13    (c) Upon the filing with the court of a verified statement 14of services rendered the court shall order the county 15treasurer of the county of trial to pay counsel other than the 16Public Defender a reasonable fee. The court shall consider all 17relevant circumstances, including but not limited to the time 18spent while court is in session, other time spent in 19representing the defendant, and expenses reasonably incurred 20by counsel. In counties with a population greater than 212,000,000, the court shall order the county treasurer of the 22county of trial to pay counsel other than the Public Defender a 23reasonable fee stated in the order and based upon a rate of 24compensation of not more than $40 for each hour spent while 25court is in session and not more than $30 for each hour 26otherwise spent representing a defendant, and such   SB1200- 34 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1compensation shall not exceed $150 for each defendant 2represented in misdemeanor cases and $1250 in felony cases, in 3addition to expenses reasonably incurred as hereinafter in 4this Section provided, except that, in extraordinary 5circumstances, payment in excess of the limits herein stated 6may be made if the trial court certifies that such payment is 7necessary to provide fair compensation for protracted 8representation. A trial court may entertain the filing of this 9verified statement before the termination of the cause, and 10may order the provisional payment of sums during the pendency 11of the cause.12    (d) In capital cases, in addition to counsel, if the court 13determines that the defendant is indigent the court may, upon 14the filing with the court of a verified statement of services 15rendered, order the county Treasurer of the county of trial to 16pay necessary expert witnesses for defendant reasonable 17compensation stated in the order not to exceed $250 for each 18defendant.19    (e) If the court in any county having a population greater 20than 2,000,000 determines that the defendant is indigent the 21court may, upon the filing with the court of a verified 22statement of such expenses, order the county treasurer of the 23county of trial, in such counties having a population greater 24than 2,000,000 to pay the general expenses of the trial 25incurred by the defendant not to exceed $50 for each 26defendant.  SB1200- 35 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    (f) The provisions of this Section relating to appointment 2of counsel, compensation of counsel, and payment of expenses 3in capital cases apply except when the compensation and 4expenses are being provided under the Capital Crimes 5Litigation Act of 2025.6(Source: P.A. 91-589, eff. 1-1-00.) 7    (725 ILCS 5/119-1)8    Sec. 119-1. Death penalty restored abolished.9    (a) (Blank). Beginning on the effective date of this 10amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly, notwithstanding 11any other law to the contrary, the death penalty is abolished 12and a sentence to death may not be imposed. 13    (b) All unobligated and unexpended moneys remaining in the 14Capital Litigation Trust Fund on the effective date of this 15amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly shall be 16transferred into the Death Penalty Abolition Fund on the 17effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 18Assembly shall be transferred into the Capital Litigation 19Trust Fund , a special fund in the State treasury, to be 20expended by the Illinois Criminal Justice Information 21Authority, for services for families of victims of homicide or 22murder and for training of law enforcement personnel. 23(Source: P.A. 96-1543, eff. 7-1-11.) 24    Section 110. The State Appellate Defender Act is amended   SB1200- 36 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1by changing Section 10 as follows: 2    (725 ILCS 105/10)  (from Ch. 38, par. 208-10)3    Sec. 10. Powers and duties of State Appellate Defender. 4    (a) The State Appellate Defender shall represent indigent 5persons on appeal in criminal and delinquent minor 6proceedings, when appointed to do so by a court under a Supreme 7Court Rule or law of this State. 8    (b) The State Appellate Defender shall submit a budget for 9the approval of the State Appellate Defender Commission.10    (c) The State Appellate Defender may:11        (1) maintain a panel of private attorneys available to 12    serve as counsel on a case basis;13        (2) establish programs, alone or in conjunction with 14    law schools, for the purpose of utilizing volunteer law 15    students as legal assistants;16        (3) cooperate and consult with state agencies, 17    professional associations, and other groups concerning the 18    causes of criminal conduct, the rehabilitation and 19    correction of persons charged with and convicted of crime, 20    the administration of criminal justice, and, in counties 21    of less than 1,000,000 population, study, design, develop 22    and implement model systems for the delivery of trial 23    level defender services, and make an annual report to the 24    General Assembly;25        (4) hire investigators to provide investigative   SB1200- 37 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    services to appointed counsel and county public defenders;2        (5) (blank);3        (5.1) in cases in which a death sentence is an 4    authorized disposition, provide trial counsel with legal 5    assistance and the assistance of expert witnesses, 6    investigators, and mitigation specialists from funds 7    appropriated to the State Appellate Defender specifically 8    for that purpose by the General Assembly. The Office of 9    State Appellate Defender shall not be appointed to serve 10    as trial counsel in capital cases; 11        (5.5) provide training to county public defenders;12        (5.7) provide county public defenders with the 13    assistance of expert witnesses and investigators from 14    funds appropriated to the State Appellate Defender 15    specifically for that purpose by the General Assembly. The 16    Office of the State Appellate Defender shall not be 17    appointed to act as trial counsel;18        (6) develop a Juvenile Defender Resource Center to: 19    (i) study, design, develop, and implement model systems 20    for the delivery of trial level defender services for 21    juveniles in the justice system; (ii) in cases in which a 22    sentence of incarceration or an adult sentence, or both, 23    is an authorized disposition, provide trial counsel with 24    legal advice and the assistance of expert witnesses and 25    investigators from funds appropriated to the Office of the 26    State Appellate Defender by the General Assembly   SB1200- 38 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    specifically for that purpose; (iii) develop and provide 2    training to public defenders on juvenile justice issues, 3    utilizing resources including the State and local bar 4    associations, the Illinois Public Defender Association, 5    law schools, the Midwest Juvenile Defender Center, and pro 6    bono efforts by law firms; and (iv) make an annual report 7    to the General Assembly.8    Investigators employed by the Capital Trial Assistance 9Unit and Capital Post Conviction Unit of the State Appellate 10Defender shall be authorized to inquire through the Illinois 11State Police or local law enforcement with the Law Enforcement 12Agencies Data System (LEADS) under Section 2605-375 of the 13Civil Administrative Code of Illinois to ascertain whether 14their potential witnesses have a criminal background, 15including, but not limited to: (i) warrants; (ii) arrests; 16(iii) convictions; and (iv) officer safety information. This 17authorization applies only to information held on the State 18level and shall be used only to protect the personal safety of 19the investigators. Any information that is obtained through 20this inquiry may not be disclosed by the investigators. 21    (c-5) For each State fiscal year, the State Appellate 22Defender shall request a direct appropriation from the Capital 23Litigation Trust Fund for expenses incurred by the State 24Appellate Defender in providing assistance to trial attorneys 25under paragraph (5.1) of subsection (c) of this Section and 26for expenses incurred by the State Appellate Defender in   SB1200- 39 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1representing petitioners in capital cases in post-conviction 2proceedings under Article 122 of the Code of Criminal 3Procedure of 1963 and in relation to petitions filed under 4Section 2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure in relation to 5capital cases and for the representation of those petitioners 6by attorneys approved by or contracted with the State 7Appellate Defender and an appropriation to the State Treasurer 8for payments from the Trust Fund for the defense of cases in 9counties other than Cook County. The State Appellate Defender 10may appear before the General Assembly at other times during 11the State's fiscal year to request supplemental appropriations 12from the Trust Fund to the State Treasurer. 13    (d) (Blank).14    (e) The requirement for reporting to the General Assembly 15shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as required 16by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization Act and 17filing such additional copies with the State Government Report 18Distribution Center for the General Assembly as is required 19under paragraph (t) of Section 7 of the State Library Act.20(Source: P.A. 99-78, eff. 7-20-15; 100-1148, eff. 12-10-18.) 21    Section 115. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 22changing Section 5-8-1 as follows: 23    (730 ILCS 5/5-8-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1005-8-1)24    Sec. 5-8-1. Natural life imprisonment; enhancements for   SB1200- 40 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1use of a firearm; mandatory supervised release terms. 2    (a) Except as otherwise provided in the statute defining 3the offense or in Article 4.5 of Chapter V, a sentence of 4imprisonment for a felony shall be a determinate sentence set 5by the court under this Section, subject to Section 5-4.5-115 6of this Code, according to the following limitations:7        (1) for first degree murder,8            (a) (blank),9            (a-1) if the defendant had at the time of the 10        commission of the offense attained 18 years of age or 11        more, the court may sentence the defendant to death 12        under the procedures described in subsections (a-2) 13        through (a-11) if:14                (1) the murdered individual was a peace 15            officer, employee of an institution or facility of 16            the Department of Corrections or any similar local 17            correctional agency, or fireman killed in the 18            course of performing his or her official duties, 19            to prevent the performance of his or her official 20            duties, or in retaliation for performing his or 21            her official duties, and the defendant knew or 22            should have known that the murdered individual was 23            so employed;24                (2) the defendant has been convicted of 25            murdering 2 or more individuals under subsection 26            (a) of Section 9-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012 or   SB1200- 41 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1            under any law of the United States or of any state 2            which is substantially similar to subsection (a) 3            of Section 9-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012 4            regardless of whether the deaths occurred as the 5            result of the same act or of several related or 6            unrelated acts so long as the deaths were the 7            result of either an intent to kill more than one 8            person or of separate acts which the defendant 9            knew would cause death or create a strong 10            probability of death or great bodily harm to the 11            murdered individual or another; or12                (3) the murdered individual was under 12 years 13            of age and the death resulted from exceptionally 14            brutal or heinous behavior indicative of wanton 15            cruelty; 16                (4) the murder was committed by the defendant 17            upon the grounds of a school or grounds adjacent 18            to a school, or is in any part of a building used 19            for school purposes; 20                (5) the murder was committed by the defendant 21            in connection with or as a result of the offense of 22            terrorism as defined in Section 29D-14.9 of the 23            Criminal Code of 2012; or 24                (6) the murdered individual was a member of a 25            congregation engaged in prayer or other religious 26            activities at a church, synagogue, mosque, or   SB1200- 42 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1            other building, structure, or place used for 2            religious worship. 3            (a-2) The court shall consider, or shall instruct 4            the jury to consider, any aggravating and any 5            mitigating factors which are relevant to the 6            imposition of the death penalty. Aggravating 7            factors may include, but need not be limited to, 8            those factors set forth in subsections (b) and 9            (b-5). Mitigating factors may include but need not 10            be limited to the following: 11                (1) the defendant has no significant history 12            of prior criminal activity; 13                (2) the murder was committed while the 14            defendant was under the influence of extreme 15            mental or emotional disturbance, although not such 16            as to constitute a defense to prosecution;17                (3) the murdered individual was a participant 18            in the defendant's homicidal conduct or consented 19            to the homicidal act; 20                (4) the defendant acted under the compulsion 21            of threat or menace of the imminent infliction of 22            death or great bodily harm; 23                (5) the defendant was not personally present 24            during commission of the act or acts causing 25            death; 26                (6) the defendant's background includes a   SB1200- 43 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1            history of extreme emotional or physical abuse; 2                (7) the defendant suffers from a reduced 3            mental capacity. Provided, however, that an action 4            that does not otherwise mitigate first degree 5            murder cannot qualify as a mitigating factor for 6            first degree murder because of the discovery, 7            knowledge, or disclosure of the victim's sexual 8            orientation as defined in Section 1-103 of the 9            Illinois Human Rights Act. 10            (a-3) If requested by the State, the court shall 11        conduct a separate sentencing proceeding to determine 12        the existence of factors set forth in subsections (b) 13        and (b-5) and to consider any aggravating or 14        mitigating factors as indicated in this subsection 15        (a-2). The proceeding shall be conducted: 16                (1) before the jury that determined the 17            defendant's guilt; or 18                (2) before a jury impanelled for the purpose 19            of the proceeding if:20                    (A) the defendant was convicted upon a 21                plea of guilty; or 22                    (B) the defendant was convicted after a 23                trial before the court sitting without a jury; 24                or 25                    (C) the court for good cause shown 26                discharges the jury that determined the   SB1200- 44 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1                defendant's guilt; or 2                (3) before the court alone if the defendant 3            waives a jury for the separate proceeding. 4            (a-4) During the proceeding any information 5        relevant to any of the factors set forth in 6        subsections (b) and (b-5) may be presented by either 7        the State or the defendant under the rules governing 8        the admission of evidence at criminal trials. Any 9        information relevant to any additional aggravating 10        factors or any mitigating factors indicated in 11        subsection (a-2) may be presented by the State or 12        defendant regardless of its admissibility under the 13        rules governing the admission of evidence at criminal 14        trials. The State and the defendant shall be given 15        fair opportunity to rebut any information received at 16        the hearing. 17            (a-5) The burden of proof of establishing the 18        existence of any of the factors set forth in 19        subsections (b) and (b-5) is on the State and shall not 20        be satisfied unless established beyond a reasonable 21        doubt. 22            (a-6) If at the separate sentencing proceeding the 23        jury finds that none of the factors set forth in 24        subsections (b) and (b-5) exists, the court shall 25        sentence the defendant to a term of imprisonment under 26        Chapter V. If there is a unanimous finding by the jury   SB1200- 45 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1        that one or more of the factors set forth in 2        subsections (b) and (b-5) exist, the jury shall 3        consider aggravating and mitigating factors as 4        instructed by the court and shall determine whether 5        the sentence of death shall be imposed. If the jury 6        determines unanimously, after weighing the factors in 7        aggravation and mitigation, that death is the 8        appropriate sentence, the court shall sentence the 9        defendant to death. If the court does not concur with 10        the jury determination that death is the appropriate 11        sentence, the court shall set forth reasons in writing 12        including what facts or circumstances the court relied 13        upon, along with any relevant documents, that 14        compelled the court to non-concur with the sentence. 15        This document and any attachments shall be part of the 16        record for appellate review. The court shall be bound 17        by the jury's sentencing determination. If after 18        weighing the factors in aggravation and mitigation, 19        one or more jurors determines that death is not the 20        appropriate sentence, the court shall sentence the 21        defendant to a term of imprisonment under Chapter V of 22        the Unified Code of Corrections. 23            (a-7) In a proceeding before the court alone, if 24        the court finds that none of the factors found in 25        subsections (b) and (b-5) exists, the court shall 26        sentence the defendant to a term of imprisonment under   SB1200- 46 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1        Chapter V of the Unified Code of Corrections. If the 2        Court determines that one or more of the factors set 3        forth in subsections (b) and (b-5) exists, the court 4        shall consider any aggravating and mitigating factors 5        as indicated in subsection (a-2). If the court 6        determines, after weighing the factors in aggravation 7        and mitigation, that death is the appropriate 8        sentence, the Court shall sentence the defendant to 9        death. If the court finds that death is not the 10        appropriate sentence, the court shall sentence the 11        defendant to a term of imprisonment under Chapter V of 12        the Unified Code of Corrections. 13            (a-8) In a case in which the defendant has been 14        found guilty of first degree murder by a judge or jury, 15        or a case on remand for resentencing, and the State 16        seeks the death penalty as an appropriate sentence, on 17        the court's own motion or the written motion of the 18        defendant, the court may decertify the case as a death 19        penalty case if the court finds that the only evidence 20        supporting the defendant's conviction is the 21        uncorroborated testimony of an informant witness, as 22        defined in Section 115-21 of the Code of Criminal 23        Procedure of 1963, concerning the confession or 24        admission of the defendant or that the sole evidence 25        against the defendant is a single eyewitness or single 26        accomplice without any other corroborating evidence.   SB1200- 47 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1        If the court decertifies the case as a capital case 2        under either of the grounds set forth above, the court 3        shall issue a written finding. The State may pursue 4        its right to appeal the decertification pursuant to 5        Supreme Court Rule 604(a)(1). If the court does not 6        decertify the case as a capital case, the matter shall 7        proceed to the eligibility phase of the sentencing 8        hearing. 9            (a-9) The conviction and sentence of death shall 10        be subject to automatic review by the Supreme Court. 11        Such review shall be in accordance with rules 12        promulgated by the Supreme Court. The Illinois Supreme 13        Court may overturn the death sentence, and order the 14        imposition of imprisonment under Chapter V if the 15        court finds that the death sentence is fundamentally 16        unjust as applied to the particular case. If the 17        Illinois Supreme Court finds that the death sentence 18        is fundamentally unjust as applied to the particular 19        case, independent of any procedural grounds for 20        relief, the Illinois Supreme Court shall issue a 21        written opinion explaining this finding. 22            (a-10) If the death penalty in this amendatory Act 23        of the 104th General Assembly is held to be 24        unconstitutional by the Supreme Court of the United 25        States or of the State of Illinois, any person 26        convicted of first degree murder shall be sentenced by   SB1200- 48 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1        the court to a term of imprisonment under Chapter V. If 2        any death sentence pursuant to the sentencing 3        provisions of this Section is declared 4        unconstitutional by the Supreme Court of the United 5        States or of the State of Illinois, the court having 6        jurisdiction over a person previously sentenced to 7        death shall cause the defendant to be brought before 8        the court, and the court shall sentence the defendant 9        to a term of imprisonment under Chapter V. 10            (a-11) The Attorney General and State's Attorneys 11        Association shall consult on voluntary guidelines for 12        procedures governing whether or not to seek the death 13        penalty. The guidelines do not have the force of law 14        and are only advisory in nature, or 15            (b) if a trier of fact finds beyond a reasonable 16        doubt that the murder was accompanied by exceptionally 17        brutal or heinous behavior indicative of wanton 18        cruelty or, except as set forth in subsection 19        (a)(1)(c) of this Section, that any of the aggravating 20        factors listed in subparagraph (b-5) are present, the 21        court may sentence the defendant, subject to Section 22        5-4.5-105, to a term of natural life imprisonment, or23            (b-5) a A defendant who at the time of the 24        commission of the offense has attained the age of 18 or 25        more and who has been found guilty of first degree 26        murder for which the death penalty has not been   SB1200- 49 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1        imposed by the court may be sentenced to a term of 2        natural life imprisonment if: 3                (1) the murdered individual was an inmate at 4            an institution or facility of the Department of 5            Corrections, or any similar local correctional 6            agency and was killed on the grounds thereof, or 7            the murdered individual was otherwise present in 8            such institution or facility with the knowledge 9            and approval of the chief administrative officer 10            thereof; 11                (2) the murdered individual was killed as a 12            result of the hijacking of an airplane, train, 13            ship, bus, or other public conveyance; 14                (3) the defendant committed the murder 15            pursuant to a contract, agreement, or 16            understanding by which he or she was to receive 17            money or anything of value in return for 18            committing the murder or procured another to 19            commit the murder for money or anything of value; 20                (4) the murdered individual was killed in the 21            course of another felony if: 22                    (A) the murdered individual: 23                        (i) was actually killed by the 24                    defendant, or 25                        (ii) received physical injuries 26                    personally inflicted by the defendant   SB1200- 50 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1                    substantially contemporaneously with 2                    physical injuries caused by one or more 3                    persons for whose conduct the defendant is 4                    legally accountable under Section 5-2 of 5                    this Code, and the physical injuries 6                    inflicted by either the defendant or the 7                    other person or persons for whose conduct 8                    he is legally accountable caused the death 9                    of the murdered individual; and (B) in 10                    performing the acts which caused the death 11                    of the murdered individual or which 12                    resulted in physical injuries personally 13                    inflicted by the defendant on the murdered 14                    individual under the circumstances of 15                    subdivision (ii) of clause (A) of this 16                    clause (4), the defendant acted with the 17                    intent to kill the murdered individual or 18                    with the knowledge that his or her acts 19                    created a strong probability of death or 20                    great bodily harm to the murdered 21                    individual or another; and 22                    (B) in performing the acts which caused 23                the death of the murdered individual or which 24                resulted in physical injuries personally 25                inflicted by the defendant on the murdered 26                individual under the circumstances of   SB1200- 51 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1                subdivision (ii) of clause (A) of this clause 2                (4), the defendant acted with the intent to 3                kill the murdered individual or with the 4                knowledge that his or her acts created a 5                strong probability of death or great bodily 6                harm to the murdered individual or another; 7                and 8                    (C) the other felony was an inherently 9                violent crime or the attempt to commit an 10                inherently violent crime. In this clause (C), 11                "inherently violent crime" includes, but is 12                not limited to, armed robbery, robbery, 13                predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, 14                aggravated criminal sexual assault, aggravated 15                kidnapping, aggravated vehicular hijacking, 16                aggravated arson, aggravated stalking, 17                residential burglary, and home invasion; 18                (5) the defendant committed the murder with 19            intent to prevent the murdered individual from 20            testifying or participating in any criminal 21            investigation or prosecution or giving material 22            assistance to the State in any investigation or 23            prosecution, either against the defendant or 24            another; or the defendant committed the murder 25            because the murdered individual was a witness in 26            any prosecution or gave material assistance to the   SB1200- 52 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1            State in any investigation or prosecution, either 2            against the defendant or another; for purposes of 3            this clause (5), "participating in any criminal 4            investigation or prosecution" is intended to 5            include those appearing in the proceedings in any 6            capacity such as trial judges, prosecutors, 7            defense attorneys, investigators, witnesses, or 8            jurors; 9                (6) the defendant, while committing an offense 10            punishable under Section 401, 401.1, 401.2, 405, 11            405.2, 407, or 407.1 or subsection (b) of Section 12            404 of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, or 13            while engaged in a conspiracy or solicitation to 14            commit such offense, intentionally killed an 15            individual or counseled, commanded, induced, 16            procured, or caused the intentional killing of the 17            murdered individual; 18                (7) the defendant was incarcerated in an 19            institution or facility of the Department of 20            Corrections at the time of the murder, and while 21            committing an offense punishable as a felony under 22            Illinois law, or while engaged in a conspiracy or 23            solicitation to commit such offense, intentionally 24            killed an individual or counseled, commanded, 25            induced, procured, or caused the intentional 26            killing of the murdered individual;   SB1200- 53 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1                (8) the murder was committed in a cold, 2            calculated and premeditated manner pursuant to a 3            preconceived plan, scheme, or design to take a 4            human life by unlawful means, and the conduct of 5            the defendant created a reasonable expectation 6            that the death of a human being would result 7            therefrom; 8                (9) the defendant was a principal 9            administrator, organizer, or leader of a 10            calculated criminal drug conspiracy consisting of 11            a hierarchical position of authority superior to 12            that of all other members of the conspiracy, and 13            the defendant counseled, commanded, induced, 14            procured, or caused the intentional killing of the 15            murdered person; 16                (10) the murder was intentional and involved 17            the infliction of torture. For the purpose of this 18            clause (10), torture means the infliction of or 19            subjection to extreme physical pain, motivated by 20            an intent to increase or prolong the pain, 21            suffering, or agony of the victim; 22                (11) the murder was committed as a result of 23            the intentional discharge of a firearm by the 24            defendant from a motor vehicle and the victim was 25            not present within the motor vehicle; 26                (12) the murdered individual was a person with   SB1200- 54 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1            a disability and the defendant knew or should have 2            known that the murdered individual was a person 3            with a disability. For purposes of this clause 4            (12), "person with a disability" means a person 5            who suffers from a permanent physical or mental 6            impairment resulting from disease, an injury, a 7            functional disorder, or a congenital condition 8            that renders the person incapable of adequately 9            providing for his or her own health or personal 10            care; 11                (13) the murdered individual was subject to an 12            order of protection and the murder was committed 13            by a person against whom the same order of 14            protection was issued under the Illinois Domestic 15            Violence Act of 1986; 16                (14) the murdered individual was known by the 17            defendant to be a teacher or other person employed 18            in any school and the teacher or other employee is 19            upon the grounds of a school or grounds adjacent 20            to a school, or is in any part of a building used 21            for school purposes; 22                (15) the murder was committed by the defendant 23            in connection with or as a result of the offense of 24            terrorism as defined in Section 29D-14.9 of this 25            Code; 26                (16) the murdered individual was a member of a   SB1200- 55 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1            congregation engaged in prayer or other religious 2            activities at a church, synagogue, mosque, or 3            other building, structure, or place used for 4            religious worship; or 5                (17)(i) the murdered individual was a 6            physician, physician assistant, psychologist, 7            nurse, or advanced practice registered nurse; 8                (ii) the defendant knew or should have known 9            that the murdered individual was a physician, 10            physician assistant, psychologist, nurse, or 11            advanced practice registered nurse; and 12                (iii) the murdered individual was killed in 13            the course of acting in his or her capacity as a 14            physician, physician assistant, psychologist, 15            nurse, or advanced practice registered nurse, or 16            to prevent him or her from acting in that 17            capacity, or in retaliation for his or her acting 18            in that capacity. 19            (c) if the court does not impose the death 20        penalty, the court shall sentence the defendant to a 21        term of natural life imprisonment if the defendant, at 22        the time of the commission of the murder, had attained 23        the age of 18, and: 24                (i) has previously been convicted of first 25            degree murder under any state or federal law, or26                (ii) is found guilty of murdering more than   SB1200- 56 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1            one victim, or2                (iii) is found guilty of murdering a peace 3            officer, fireman, or emergency management worker 4            when the peace officer, fireman, or emergency 5            management worker was killed in the course of 6            performing his official duties, or to prevent the 7            peace officer or fireman from performing his 8            official duties, or in retaliation for the peace 9            officer, fireman, or emergency management worker 10            from performing his official duties, and the 11            defendant knew or should have known that the 12            murdered individual was a peace officer, fireman, 13            or emergency management worker, or14                (iv) is found guilty of murdering an employee 15            of an institution or facility of the Department of 16            Corrections, or any similar local correctional 17            agency, when the employee was killed in the course 18            of performing his official duties, or to prevent 19            the employee from performing his official duties, 20            or in retaliation for the employee performing his 21            official duties, or22                (v) is found guilty of murdering an emergency 23            medical technician - ambulance, emergency medical 24            technician - intermediate, emergency medical 25            technician - paramedic, ambulance driver, or other 26            medical assistance or first aid person while   SB1200- 57 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1            employed by a municipality or other governmental 2            unit when the person was killed in the course of 3            performing official duties or to prevent the 4            person from performing official duties or in 5            retaliation for performing official duties and the 6            defendant knew or should have known that the 7            murdered individual was an emergency medical 8            technician - ambulance, emergency medical 9            technician - intermediate, emergency medical 10            technician - paramedic, ambulance driver, or other 11            medical assistant or first aid personnel, or12                (vi) (blank), or13                (vii) is found guilty of first degree murder 14            and the murder was committed by reason of any 15            person's activity as a community policing 16            volunteer or to prevent any person from engaging 17            in activity as a community policing volunteer. For 18            the purpose of this Section, "community policing 19            volunteer" has the meaning ascribed to it in 20            Section 2-3.5 of the Criminal Code of 2012.21            For purposes of clause (v), "emergency medical 22        technician - ambulance", "emergency medical technician -23         intermediate", and "emergency medical technician - 24        paramedic", have the meanings ascribed to them in the 25        Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act.26            (d)(i) if the person committed the offense while   SB1200- 58 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1            armed with a firearm, 15 years shall be added to 2            the term of imprisonment imposed by the court;3            (ii) if, during the commission of the offense, the 4        person personally discharged a firearm, 20 years shall 5        be added to the term of imprisonment imposed by the 6        court;7            (iii) if, during the commission of the offense, 8        the person personally discharged a firearm that 9        proximately caused great bodily harm, permanent 10        disability, permanent disfigurement, or death to 11        another person, 25 years or up to a term of natural 12        life shall be added to the term of imprisonment 13        imposed by the court.14        (2) (blank);15        (2.5) for a person who has attained the age of 18 years 16    at the time of the commission of the offense and who is 17    convicted under the circumstances described in subdivision 18    (b)(1)(B) of Section 11-1.20 or paragraph (3) of 19    subsection (b) of Section 12-13, subdivision (d)(2) of 20    Section 11-1.30 or paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of 21    Section 12-14, subdivision (b)(1.2) of Section 11-1.40 or 22    paragraph (1.2) of subsection (b) of Section 12-14.1, 23    subdivision (b)(2) of Section 11-1.40 or paragraph (2) of 24    subsection (b) of Section 12-14.1 of the Criminal Code of 25    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, the sentence shall be a 26    term of natural life imprisonment.  SB1200- 59 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    (b) (Blank).2    (c) (Blank).3    (d) Subject to earlier termination under Section 3-3-8, 4the parole or mandatory supervised release term shall be 5written as part of the sentencing order and shall be as 6follows:7        (1) for first degree murder or for the offenses of 8    predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated 9    criminal sexual assault, and criminal sexual assault if 10    committed on or before December 12, 2005, 3 years;11        (1.5) except as provided in paragraph (7) of this 12    subsection (d), for a Class X felony except for the 13    offenses of predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, 14    aggravated criminal sexual assault, and criminal sexual 15    assault if committed on or after December 13, 2005 (the 16    effective date of Public Act 94-715) and except for the 17    offense of aggravated child pornography under Section 18    11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 11-20.1 with sentencing under 19    subsection (c-5) of Section 11-20.1 of the Criminal Code 20    of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, if committed on or 21    after January 1, 2009, and except for the offense of 22    obscene depiction of a purported child with sentencing 23    under subsection (d) of Section 11-20.4 of the Criminal 24    Code of 2012, 18 months; 25        (2) except as provided in paragraph (7) of this 26    subsection (d), for a Class 1 felony or a Class 2 felony   SB1200- 60 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    except for the offense of criminal sexual assault if 2    committed on or after December 13, 2005 (the effective 3    date of Public Act 94-715) and except for the offenses of 4    manufacture and dissemination of child pornography under 5    clauses (a)(1) and (a)(2) of Section 11-20.1 of the 6    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, if 7    committed on or after January 1, 2009, and except for the 8    offense of obscene depiction of a purported child under 9    paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Section 11-20.4 of the 10    Criminal Code of 2012, 12 months;11        (3) except as provided in paragraph (4), (6), or (7) 12    of this subsection (d), for a Class 3 felony or a Class 4 13    felony, 6 months; no later than 45 days after the onset of 14    the term of mandatory supervised release, the Prisoner 15    Review Board shall conduct a discretionary discharge 16    review pursuant to the provisions of Section 3-3-8, which 17    shall include the results of a standardized risk and needs 18    assessment tool administered by the Department of 19    Corrections; the changes to this paragraph (3) made by 20    Public Act 102-1104 this amendatory Act of the 102nd 21    General Assembly apply to all individuals released on 22    mandatory supervised release on or after December 6, 2022 23    (the effective date of Public Act 102-1104) this 24    amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, including 25    those individuals whose sentences were imposed prior to 26    December 6, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act   SB1200- 61 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    102-1104) this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 2    Assembly;3        (4) for defendants who commit the offense of predatory 4    criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal 5    sexual assault, or criminal sexual assault, on or after 6    December 13, 2005 (the effective date of Public Act 7    94-715), or who commit the offense of aggravated child 8    pornography under Section 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 11-20.1 9    with sentencing under subsection (c-5) of Section 11-20.1 10    of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 11    manufacture of child pornography, or dissemination of 12    child pornography after January 1, 2009, or who commit the 13    offense of obscene depiction of a purported child under 14    paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Section 11-20.4 of the 15    Criminal Code of 2012 or who commit the offense of obscene 16    depiction of a purported child with sentencing under 17    subsection (d) of Section 11-20.4 of the Criminal Code of 18    2012, the term of mandatory supervised release shall range 19    from a minimum of 3 years to a maximum of the natural life 20    of the defendant;21        (5) if the victim is under 18 years of age, for a 22    second or subsequent offense of aggravated criminal sexual 23    abuse or felony criminal sexual abuse, 4 years, at least 24    the first 2 years of which the defendant shall serve in an 25    electronic monitoring or home detention program under 26    Article 8A of Chapter V of this Code;  SB1200- 62 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1        (6) for a felony domestic battery, aggravated domestic 2    battery, stalking, aggravated stalking, and a felony 3    violation of an order of protection, 4 years; 4        (7) for any felony described in paragraph (a)(2)(ii), 5    (a)(2)(iii), (a)(2)(iv), (a)(2)(vi), (a)(2.1), (a)(2.3), 6    (a)(2.4), (a)(2.5), or (a)(2.6) of Article 5, Section 7    3-6-3 of the Unified Code of Corrections requiring an 8    inmate to serve a minimum of 85% of their court-imposed 9    sentence, except for the offenses of predatory criminal 10    sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal sexual 11    assault, and criminal sexual assault if committed on or 12    after December 13, 2005 (the effective date of Public Act 13    94-715) and except for the offense of aggravated child 14    pornography under Section 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 11-20.1 15    with sentencing under subsection (c-5) of Section 11-20.1 16    of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 17    if committed on or after January 1, 2009, and except for 18    the offense of obscene depiction of a purported child with 19    sentencing under subsection (d) of Section 11-20.4 of the 20    Criminal Code of 2012, and except as provided in paragraph 21    (4) or paragraph (6) of this subsection (d), the term of 22    mandatory supervised release shall be as follows:23            (A) Class X felony, 3 years;24            (B) Class 1 or Class 2 felonies, 2 years;25            (C) Class 3 or Class 4 felonies, 1 year. 26    (e) (Blank).  SB1200- 63 -LRB104 03905 RLC 13929 b1    (f) (Blank).2    (g) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act and 3of Public Act 101-652: (i) the provisions of paragraph (3) of 4subsection (d) are effective on July 1, 2022 and shall apply to 5all individuals convicted on or after the effective date of 6paragraph (3) of subsection (d); and (ii) the provisions of 7paragraphs (1.5) and (2) of subsection (d) are effective on 8July 1, 2021 and shall apply to all individuals convicted on or 9after the effective date of paragraphs (1.5) and (2) of 10subsection (d).11(Source: P.A. 102-28, eff. 6-25-21; 102-687, eff. 12-17-21; 12102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 102-1104, eff. 12-6-22; 103-51, eff. 131-1-24; 103-825, eff. 1-1-25; revised 10-24-24.) 14    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 151, 2026.